Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 3
WELLS AND DRINKING WATER

Cross references.

- Anti-siphon devices for irrigation systems,

§

2-1-4

.

Licensing water and wastewater treatment plant operators and laboratory analysts, T. 43, C. 51.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Rules for safe drinking water, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations for the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-5.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1995 amendments of Code sections in this article, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 51 (1995).